Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.545

Reimbursement of advisory committee expenses.

The department from funds appropriated for the administration of the program under chapter 418, Laws of 1985 shall reimburse the expenses of the advisory committee.

[ 1985 c 418 s 10. Formerly RCW 43.215.445, 28A.215.190, 28A.34A.100.]